Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,113
Government vehicles; provisions applicable.

Unless specifically exempted, the Nebraska Rules of the Road shall apply to all drivers of vehicles owned or operated on behalf of the United States or any state or political subdivision thereof.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 7;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-607;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 209.